Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.12
Hazardous waste; department; provide staff; applicant; pay expenses.

The department shall provide a secretary and other staff persons to assist the committee. The applicant shall pay the expenses for such clerical and other help and the salary of the professional facilitator, shall pay the costs of printing the committee's report, and shall reimburse the committee members for their mileage expenses at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees. The department shall keep a record of all such costs and expenses and assess the applicant for any amount over the estimated amount on which the fee paid by the applicant was based.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 6.